Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.18B of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Pharmacy technician applicants who are seventeen (17) years
of age or older and enrolled in a youth apprenticeship program for
pharmacy technicians or a pharmacy technician training program
through the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education
shall complete Phase II pharmacy technician training in a pharmacy
without the requirement to be a pharmacy employee. All pharmacy
technician training programs shall be approved by the Oklahoma State
Board of Pharmacy initially and on an annual basis. This permit
will only be used for educational purposes for those enrolled in an
Oklahoma State Board of Pharmacy-approved program.
B. The youth apprenticeship program for pharmacy technicians
and pharmacy technician training programs through the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education shall carry liability

insurance on the students in the respective program that covers the
student anywhere the student is training in a pharmacy.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1585 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1585 Page 3